Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202084-935
Government certification, defined.

Government certification means a nontransferable recognition granted to an individual by an occupational board through a voluntary program in which the individual meets personal qualifications established by the Legislature. Government certification allows the certified individual to use a designated title. For purposes of the Occupational Board Reform Act, in analyzing health professions which are subject to the Nebraska Regulation of Health Professions Act, the definition of certification in section 71-6206 applies.

Laws 2018, LB299, § 3.

Nebraska Regulation of Health Professions Act, see section 71-6201.